Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3554
Hospital district; bonds; issuance; purpose.

The board of directors of any hospital district may, on the terms and conditions set forth in sections 23-3554 to 23-3572, issue the bonds of the district for the purpose of (1) purchasing a site for and erecting thereon a hospital, nursing home, or both, or for such purchase or erection, and furnishing and equipping the same, in such district, (2) purchasing an existing building or buildings and related furniture and equipment, including the site or sites upon which such building or buildings are located, for use as a hospital, nursing home, or both, and to furnish and equip them in such district, (3) retiring registered warrants, and (4) paying for additions to or repairs for a hospital, nursing home, or both.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 1, p. 352;

Laws 1972, LB 1168, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.49.